Florida, session 2026, SB1170.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 21 14.36, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 22 14.36âReimagining Education and Career Help Act.âThe 23 Reimagining Education and Career Help Act is created to address 24 the evolving needs of Floridaâs economy by increasing the level 25 of collaboration and cooperation among state businesses and 26 education communities while improving training within and equity 27 and access to a more integrated workforce and education system 28 for all Floridians. 29 (5)âThe office shall provide the public with access to 30 available federal, state, and local services and provide 31 stakeholders with a systemwide, global view of workforce related 32 program data across various programs through actionable 33 qualitative and quantitative information. The office shall: 34 (a)âMinimize duplication and maximize the use of existing 35 resources by facilitating the adaptation and integration of 36 state information systems to improve usability and seamlessly 37 link to the consumer-first workforce system and other compatible 38 state information systems and applications to help residents of 39 the state: 40 1.âExplore and identify career opportunities. 41 2.âIdentify in-demand jobs and associated earning 42 potential. 43 3.âIdentify the skills and credentials needed for specific 44 jobs. 45 4.âAccess a broad array of federal, state, and local 46 workforce related programs. 47 5.âDetermine the quality of workforce related programs 48 offered by public postsecondary educational institutions and 49 public and private training providers, based on employment, 50 wages, continued education, student loan debt, and receipt of 51 public assistance by graduates of workforce, certificate, or 52 degree programs. To gather this information, the office shall 53 review each workforce related program 1 year after the programâs 54 first graduating class and every 5 years after the first review. 55 6.âBy July 1, 2027, and each year thereafter, provide 56 information to help individuals understand their net potential 57 earnings as a public high school graduate with an industry 58 certification, identified as a credential of value consistent 59 with s. 445.004, and as a postsecondary graduate with an 60 associate degree in the comparable Classification of 61 Instructional Program. The potential earnings must be calculated 62 for each year, up to 8 years after graduation. The cost of 63 attendance, minus any financial aid received, must be deducted 64 from the net potential earnings. 65 7.âIdentify opportunities and resources to support 66 individuals along their career pathway. 67 8.7.âProvide information to help individuals understand 68 their potential earnings through paid employment and cope with 69 the loss of public assistance as they progress through career 70 pathways toward self-sufficiency. 71 9.8.âMap the timing and magnitude of the loss of public 72 assistance for in-demand occupations across the state to help 73 individuals visualize how their incomes will increase over time 74 as they move toward self-sufficiency. 75 Section 2.âSection 1003.574, Florida Statutes, is amended 76 to read: 77 1003.574âVideo cameras in public school classrooms; pilot 78 program.âBeginning with the 2021-2022 school year, the Video 79 Cameras in Public School Classrooms Pilot Program is created for 80 a period of 3 school years. 81 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 82 (a)ââIncidentâ means an event, a circumstance, an act, or 83 an omission that results in the abuse or neglect of a student 84 by: 85 1.âAn employee of a public school or school district; or 86 2.âAnother student. 87 (b)ââSchool districtâ means the Broward County Public 88 Schools. 89 (b)(c)ââSelf-contained classroomâ means a classroom at a 90 public school in which a majority of the students in regular 91 attendance are provided special education services and are 92 assigned to one or more such classrooms for at least 50 percent 93 of the instructional day. 94 (2)(a)âEach district school board shall vote to establish a 95 policy to provide video cameras in self-contained classrooms 96 upon the request of a parent under paragraph (b). 97 (b)(a)âA school district shall provide a video camera to 98 any school with a self-contained classroom upon the written 99 request of a parent of a student in the classroom. 100 (c)(b)âWithin 30 days after receipt of the request from a 101 parent, a video camera must shall be operational in each self 102 contained classroom in which the parentâs student is in regular 103 attendance for the remainder of the school year, unless the 104 parent withdraws his or her request in writing. 105 (3)âIf the student who is the subject of the initial 106 request is no longer in attendance in the classroom and a school 107 discontinues operation of a video camera during a school year, 108 no later than the 5th school day before the date the operation 109 of the video camera is discontinued, the school must notify the 110 parents of each student in regular attendance in the classroom 111 that operation of the video camera will cease unless the 112 continued use of the camera is requested by a parent. No later 113 than the 10th school day before the end of each school year, the 114 school must notify the parents of each student in regular 115 attendance in the classroom that operation of the video camera 116 will not continue during the following school year unless a 117 written request is submitted by a parent for the next school 118 year. 119 (4)(a)âA video camera placed in a self-contained classroom 120 must be capable of all of the following: 121 1.âMonitoring all areas of the self-contained classroom, 122 including, without limitation, any room attached to the self 123 contained classroom which is used for other purposes. 124 2.âRecording audio from all areas of the self-contained 125 classroom, including, without limitation, any room attached to 126 the self-contained classroom which is used for other purposes. 127 (b)âA video camera placed in a self-contained classroom may 128 not monitor a restroom or any other area in the self-contained 129 classroom where a student changes his or her clothes, except for 130 the entryway, exitway, or hallway outside a restroom or other 131 area where a student changes his or her clothes because of the 132 layout of the self-contained classroom. 133 (c)âA video camera placed in a self-contained classroom is 134 not required to be in operation when students are not present in 135 the self-contained classroom. 136 (d)âIf there is an interruption in the operation of the 137 video camera for any reason, an explanation must be submitted in 138 writing to the school principal and the district school board 139 which explains the reason for and duration of the interruption. 140 The written explanation must be maintained at the district 141 school board office for at least 1 year. 142 (5)âBefore a school initially places a video camera in a 143 self-contained classroom pursuant to this section, the school 144 shall provide written notice of the placement of such video 145 camera to all of the following: 146 (a)âThe parent of each student who is assigned to the self 147 contained classroom. 148 (b)âEach student who is assigned to the self-contained 149 classroom. 150 (c)âThe school district. 151 (d)âEach school employee who is assigned to work with one 152 or more students in the self-contained classroom. 153 (6)âA school shall: 154 (a)âRetain video recorded from a video camera placed 155 pursuant to this section for at least 3 months after the date 156 the video was recorded, after which the recording must shall be 157 deleted or otherwise made irretrievable unretrievable; or 158 (b)âRetain the recording until the conclusion of any 159 investigation or any administrative or legal proceedings that 160 result from the recording have been completed, including, 161 without limitation, the exhaustion of all appeals. 162 (7)âA school or school district may not: 163 (a)âAllow regular, continuous, or continual monitoring of 164 video recorded under this section; or 165 (b)âUse video recorded under this section for teacher 166 evaluations or any purpose other than for ensuring the health, 167 safety, and well-being of students receiving special education 168 services in a self-contained classroom; or 169 (c)âConceal the identity of a school or school district 170 employee who appears in a video recording. 171 (8)âThe principal of the school is the custodian of a video 172 camera operated pursuant to this section, all recordings 173 generated by that video camera, and access to such recordings. 174 (a)âThe release or viewing of any video recording under 175 this section must comply with s. 1002.22. 176 (b)âA school or school district shall: 177 1.âConceal the identity of any student who appears in a 178 video recording, but is not involved in the alleged incident 179 documented by the video recording, which the school allows to be 180 viewed under subsection (9), including, without limitation, 181 blurring the face of the uninvolved student. 182 2.âProtect the confidentiality of all student records 183 contained in a video recording in accordance with s. 1002.22. 184 (9)(a)âWithin 7 days after receiving a request to view a 185 video recording, a school or school district shall allow the 186 following individuals to view a video recording with its 187 accompanying audio made under this section: 188 1.âA school or school district employee who is involved in 189 an alleged incident that is documented by the video recording as 190 part of the investigative process; 191 2.âA parent of a student who is involved in an alleged 192 incident that is documented by the video recording and has been 193 reported to the school or school district; 194 3.âA school or school district employee as part of an 195 investigation into an alleged incident that is documented by the 196 video recording and has been reported to the school or school 197 district; 198 4.âA law enforcement officer as part of an investigation 199 into an alleged incident that is documented by the video 200 recording and has been reported to the law enforcement agency; 201 or 202 5.âThe Department of Children and Families as part of a 203 child abuse or neglect investigation. 204 (b)âA person who requests to view a recording must shall 205 make himself or herself available for viewing the recording 206 within 30 days after being notified by the school or school 207 district that the personâs request has been granted. 208 (c)âA person who views the recording and suspects that 209 child abuse has occurred must report the suspected child abuse 210 to the Department of Children and Families. 211 (10)(a)âAny individual may appeal to the State Board of 212 Education an action by a school or school district which the 213 individual alleges to be in violation of this section. 214 (b)âThe state board shall grant a hearing on an appeal 215 under this subsection within 45 days after receiving the appeal. 216 (11)âA school or school district does not violate 217 subsection (8) if a contractor or other employee of the school 218 or school district incidentally views a video recording made 219 under this section in connection with the performance of his or 220 her duties related to either of the following: 221 (a)âThe installation, operation, or maintenance of video 222 equipment; or 223 (b)âThe retention of video recordings. 224 (12)âThis section does not: 225 (a)âLimit the access of the parent of a student, under the 226 Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (FERPA), 20 U.S.C. s. 227 1232g, or any other law, to a video recording regarding his or 228 her student. 229 (b)âWaive any immunity from liability of a school district 230 or an employee of a school district. 231 (c)âCreate any liability for a cause of action against a 232 school or school district or an employee of a school or school 233 district carrying out the duties and responsibilities required 234 by this section. 235 (d)âApply to self-contained classrooms in which the only 236 students receiving special education services are those who have 237 been deemed gifted. 238 (13)âThe department shall collect information relating to 239 the installation and maintenance of video cameras under this 240 section. 241 (14)âThe State Board of Education may adopt rules to 242 implement this section. 243 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.